apertium-glk.glk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ؤئاآأٰبپتثجچحخدذرزژسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنهوی</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="time"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->
    <pardef n="کیتاب__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->
    <pardef n="imp_endings">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imp_endings2">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ییم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imp_endings_1/2pl">
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-1sg">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-3sg">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pers-1-pp">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-2-3sg">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-3-3sg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-rest">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یدی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یدی</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کون__vblex" c="present">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="اَ__vblex" c="present, a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوکون__vblex" c="present subjunctive">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="باَ__vblex" c="present subjunctive, a-vowel stem end, note: no imperative">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بد__vblex" c="present subjunctive for stems with vowels ending in a, with a special imperative 2sg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings_1/2pl"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ببه__vblex" c="present subjunctive 1sg/3sg for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بیبی__vblex" c="present subjunctive other endings for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بیشی__vblex" c="special present subjunctive for شوئون because it has an irregular 2sg imperative which isn't built off this stem. See بوشو/ئون__vblex ">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings_1/2pl"/></e>
    </pardef>      
    
    <pardef n="نوکون__vblex" c="negative present/subjunctive">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ناَ__vblex" c="negative present/subjunctive, a-vowel stem end, note: no imperative">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="کیتاب"><i>کیتاب</i><par n="کیتاب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بوستن"><p><l>بب</l><r>بوستن</r></p><par n="ببه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بوستن"><p><l>بیب</l><r>بوستن</r></p><par n="بیبی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>بش</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="ببه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>بیش</l><r>شوئون</r></p><par n="بیشی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="زِئن"><p><l>زن</l><r>زِئن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَئن"><p><l>بد</l><r>دَئن</r></p><par n="بد__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>اَ</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="اَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>بأ</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="باَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>نأ</l><r>اَمون</r></p><par n="ناَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>بیأ</l><r>اَمون<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings2"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمون"><p><l>نیأ</l><r>اَمون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings2"/></e>
    <e lm="گفتن"><p><l>بگ</l><r>گفتن</r></p><par n="ببه__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گفتن"><p><l>بیگی</l><r>گفتن</r></p><par n="بیبی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَوردن"><p><l>بأور</l><r>اَوردن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اَوردن"><p><l>نأور</l><r>اَوردن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ایسَن"><p><l>ایس</l><r>ایسَن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بخشن"><p><l>ببخش</l><r>بخشن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بخشن"><p><l>نبخش</l><r>بخشن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بردن"><p><l>بر</l><r>بردن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ترکستن"><p><l>بترک</l><r>ترکستن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ترکستن"><p><l>نترک</l><r>ترکستن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تَوَدن"><p><l>تَوَد</l><r>تَوَدن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوأستن"><p><l>بخوأ</l><r>خوأستن</r></p><par n="باَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوأستن"><p><l>خوأ</l><r>خوأستن</r></p><par n="اَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوأستن"><p><l>نخوأ</l><r>خوأستن</r></p><par n="ناَ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوفتن"><p><l>بوخوس</l><r>خوفتن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خوفتن"><p><l>نوخوس</l><r>خوفتن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دأشتن"><p><l>دأر</l><r>دأشتن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دووستن"><p><l>دودو</l><r>دووستن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دووستن"><p><l>دوندو</l><r>دووستن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَوَستن"><p><l>دَوَد</l><r>دَوَستن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سوختن"><p><l>بوسوز</l><r>سوختن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سوختن"><p><l>نوسوز</l><r>سوختن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شنأختن"><p><l>شنأس</l><r>شنأختن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فهمستن"><p><l>بفهم</l><r>فهمستن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فهمستن"><p><l>نفهم</l><r>فهمستن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فوروختن"><p><l>فوروش</l><r>فوروختن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="مأنستن2"><p><l>بمأن</l><r>مأنستن2</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="مأنستن2"><p><l>نمأن</l><r>مأنستن2</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="مردن"><p><l>میر</l><r>مردن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیشتن"><p><l>بینیشین</l><r>نیشتن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیشتن"><p><l>نینیشین</l><r>نیشتن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نیویشتن"><p><l>نیویس</l><r>نیویشتن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَورسن"><p><l>وَنورس</l><r>وَورسن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَورسن"><p><l>وَورس</l><r>وَورسن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَون"><p><l>وَوین</l><r>وَون</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پرستن"><p><l>بپر</l><r>پرستن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پرستن"><p><l>نپر</l><r>پرستن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="چِئن"><p><l>چین</l><r>چِئن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کندن"><p><l>بکن</l><r>کندن</r></p><par n="بوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کندن"><p><l>نکن</l><r>کندن</r></p><par n="نوکون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گفتن"><p><l>گ</l><r>گفتن</r></p><par n="بیبی__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گیفتن"><p><l>فیگیر</l><r>گیفتن</r></p><par n="کون__vblex"/></e>
